Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Chapter 44

Tennessee Commission for the United States Semiquincentennial Commission Act [Effective until December 31, 2027]

4-44-101. Short title. [Effective until December 31, 2027.]

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Commission for the United States Semiquincentennial Commission Act.”

Acts 2019, ch. 384, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Former chapter 44, §§4-44-101 –4-44-109, concerning the 1996 Tennessee bicentennial commission, was deemed obsolete due to the termination of the commission, effective June 30, 1997.

Cross-References. Repealer, §4-44-116.

4-44-102. Part definition. [Effective until December 31, 2027.]

As used in this chapter, “Commission” means the Tennessee commission for the United States semiquincentennial commission.

Acts 2019, ch. 384, § 2.

Code Commission Notes.

Former chapter 44, §§4-44-101 –4-44-109, concerning the 1996 Tennessee bicentennial commission, was deemed obsolete due to the termination of the commission, effective June 30, 1997.

Cross-References. Repealer, §4-44-116.

4-44-103. Establishment. [Effective until December 31, 2027.]

The commission is established to plan, encourage, develop, and coordinate the commemoration of the 250th anniversary of the founding of the United States, and recognize Tennessee's integral role in that event and the impact of its people on the nation's past, present, and future.

Acts 2019, ch. 384, § 3.

Code Commission Notes.

Former chapter 44, §§4-44-101 –4-44-109, concerning the 1996 Tennessee bicentennial commission, was deemed obsolete due to the termination of the commission, effective June 30, 1997.

Cross-References. Repealer, §4-44-116.

4-44-104. Membership. [Effective until December 31, 2027.]

The commission consists of thirteen (13) ex officio voting members as follows:

The commissioner of tourist development;

The state historian;

The executive director of the Tennessee historical society;

The executive director of the Tennessee historical commission;

The state librarian and archivist;

The president of the Tennessee Sons of the American Revolution;

The state regent of the Tennessee Society, Daughters of the American Revolution;

Two (2) members of the house of representatives, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

Two (2) members of the senate, to be appointed by the speaker of the senate;

The museum executive director of the state museum; and

The executive director of the East Tennessee historical society.

Acts 2019, ch. 384, § 4.

Code Commission Notes.

Former chapter 44, §§4-44-101 —4-44-109, concerning the 1996 Tennessee bicentennial commission, was deemed obsolete due to the termination of the commission, effective June 30, 1997.

Cross-References. Repealer, §4-44-116.

4-44-105. Terms of members — Vacancy. [Effective until December 31, 2027.]

Members are appointed for the duration of the commission, but serve only so long as they remain in their official position as described in §4-44-104. A vacancy on the commission does not affect the powers of the commission and is filled in the same manner as the original appointment.

Acts 2019, ch. 384, § 5.

Code Commission Notes.

Former chapter 44, §§4-44-101 —4-44-109, concerning the 1996 Tennessee bicentennial commission, was deemed obsolete due to the termination of the commission, effective June 30, 1997.

Cross-References. Repealer, §4-44-116.

4-44-106. Meetings. [Effective until December 31, 2027.]

Meetings of the commission are held throughout the state at times and locations to be determined by the chair, who is selected by a majority vote of the commission and may serve up to two (2) consecutive two-year terms. The first meeting of the commission is to be called by the commissioner of tourist development. A majority of the members of the commission constitutes a quorum.

Acts 2019, ch. 384, § 6.

Code Commission Notes.

Former chapter 44, §§4-44-101 —4-44-109, concerning the 1996 Tennessee bicentennial commission, was deemed obsolete due to the termination of the commission, effective June 30, 1997.

Cross-References. Repealer, §4-44-116.

4-44-107. Duties of the commission. [Effective until December 31, 2027.]

The commission shall:

Plan, coordinate, and implement a program to commemorate the 250th anniversary of the founding of the United States in the year 2026, specifically highlighting the role of Tennessee and Tennesseans in, and the events succeeding, the historic event; and

Coordinate with federal, state, and local agencies on infrastructural improvements and projects to welcome regional, national, and international tourists.

Acts 2019, ch. 384, § 7.

Code Commission Notes.

Former chapter 44, §§4-44-101 —4-44-109, concerning the 1996 Tennessee bicentennial commission, was deemed obsolete due to the termination of the commission, effective June 30, 1997.

Cross-References. Repealer, §4-44-116.

4-44-108. Development of plan and overall program for event. [Effective until December 31, 2027.]

In developing the plan and overall program for the event, the commission:

Shall give due consideration to related plans and programs developed by federal, state, local, and private groups;

May designate special committees with representatives from groups described in subdivision (1) to plan, develop, and coordinate specific activities;

Shall hold public meetings to solicit the input of citizens throughout the state in developing programs for the semiquincentennial. The meetings shall be held within ninety (90) days of the commission's first meeting and throughout the commission's existence;

Shall showcase all counties in this state;

Shall draw attention to the achievements, struggles, honors, innovations, and impacts of all people in this state; and

Shall clearly delineate all expenses incurred by the commission in developing the program.

Acts 2019, ch. 384, § 8.

Code Commission Notes.

Former chapter 44, §§4-44-101 —4-44-109, concerning the 1996 Tennessee bicentennial commission, was deemed obsolete due to the termination of the commission, effective June 30, 1997.

Cross-References. Repealer, §4-44-116.

4-44-109. Comprehensive report containing specific recommendations for the commemoration. [Effective until December 31, 2027.]

No later than one (1) year after July 1, 2019, the commission shall submit a comprehensive report to the governor, the speaker of the senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives that contains the commission's specific recommendations for the commemoration of the 250th anniversary of the founding of the United States and related events.

The report must include:

A detailed timeline of the commission's plan for the event through 2027;

The commission's recommendations for the allocation of costs among public and private entities that provide financial and administrative assistance to the commission;

The projected number of jobs created through the implementation of the commission's plan and overall program;

The projected economic impact of the implementation of the commission's plan and overall program;

The geographic impact of the commission's plan and overall program on all counties of this state;

A plan for improvements, if any, to the infrastructure of the state necessary to ensure the success of the commission's plan and overall program; and

Outputs and outcomes against which progress and success of the commission's plan and overall program can be measured.

The report may include recommendations for legislation necessary to effectuate the plan and overall program.

The commission shall make the report available to the public on the commission's internet website.

Acts 2019, ch. 384, § 9.

Code Commission Notes.

Former chapter 44, §§4-44-101 —4-44-109, concerning the 1996 Tennessee bicentennial commission, was deemed obsolete due to the termination of the commission, effective June 30, 1997.

Cross-References. Repealer, §4-44-116.

4-44-110. Attachment to department of tourist development — Assistance of agencies of state government. [Effective until December 31, 2027.]

The commission is administratively attached to the department of tourist development. All appropriate agencies of state government shall provide assistance to the commission upon request of the commission.

Acts 2019, ch. 384, § 10.

Code Commission Notes.

Former chapter 44, §§4-44-101 —4-44-109, concerning the 1996 Tennessee bicentennial commission, was deemed obsolete due to the termination of the commission, effective June 30, 1997.

Cross-References. Department of tourist development, §4-3-2201 et seq.

Repealer, §4-44-116.

4-44-111. Gifts and donations. [Effective until December 31, 2027.]

The commission may accept, use, and dispose of gifts and donations of money, property, or personal services. Information relating to the gifts must be enumerated and submitted to the Tennessee ethics commission each quarter and must be made available to the public on the commission's internet website.

Acts 2019, ch. 384, § 11.

Code Commission Notes.

Former chapter 44, §§4-44-101 —4-44-109, concerning the 1996 Tennessee bicentennial commission, was deemed obsolete due to the termination of the commission, effective June 30, 1997.

Cross-References. Repealer, §4-44-116.

4-44-112. Authority of the commission. [Effective until December 31, 2027.]

The commission may:

Procure supplies, services, and property;

Enter into contracts;

Expend, in furtherance of this chapter, funds donated or received in pursuance of contracts entered into under this chapter; and

Take action as necessary to enable the commission to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

Any action taken pursuant to subsection (a) must first be approved by majority vote of the commission.

Acts 2019, ch. 384, § 12.

Code Commission Notes.

Former chapter 44, §§4-44-101 —4-44-109, concerning the 1996 Tennessee bicentennial commission, was deemed obsolete due to the termination of the commission, effective June 30, 1997.

Cross-References. Repealer, §4-44-116.

4-44-113. Property acquired by the commission — Disposition. [Effective until December 31, 2027.]

Property acquired by the commission that remains after the termination of the commission may be designated by an act of the general assembly for donation to local municipalities or state agencies.

Acts 2019, ch. 384, § 13.

Code Commission Notes.

Former chapter 44, §§4-44-101 —4-44-109, concerning the 1996 Tennessee bicentennial commission, was deemed obsolete due to the termination of the commission, effective June 30, 1997.

Cross-References. Repealer, §4-44-116.

4-44-114. Expense reimbursement for commission members — Appointment of executive director and other personnel. [Effective until December 31, 2027.]

Commission members will receive no compensation for their work with the commission but may receive reimbursement for travel expenses incurred in attending meetings of the commission in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations, as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The chair of the commission may appoint an executive director and other personnel necessary for the commission to perform its powers and duties, subject to the approval of a majority vote of the entire membership of the commission.

No person appointed or employed under this chapter is eligible to participate in the state retirement system solely on the basis of such appointment to or employment with the commission.

Acts 2019, ch. 384, § 14.

Code Commission Notes.

Former chapter 44, §§4-44-101 —4-44-109, concerning the 1996 Tennessee bicentennial commission, was deemed obsolete due to the termination of the commission, effective June 30, 1997.

Cross-References. Repealer, §4-44-116.

4-44-115. Annual report. [Effective until December 31, 2027.]

The commission shall submit an annual report to the governor and the general assembly detailing the commission's activities on or before December 31 of each year. The report must include an accounting of funds received and expended during the year covered by the report, the outputs and outcomes achieved, and whether those achievements meet the commission's plan and overall program goals. The commission shall make the report available to the public on the commission's website.

Acts 2019, ch. 384, § 15.

Code Commission Notes.

Former chapter 44, §§4-44-101 —4-44-109, concerning the 1996 Tennessee bicentennial commission, was deemed obsolete due to the termination of the commission, effective June 30, 1997.

Cross-References. Repealer, §4-44-116.

4-44-116. Repealer. [Effective until December 31, 2027.]

This chapter shall be repealed and the commission shall cease to exist on December 31, 2027.

Acts 2019, ch. 384, § 16.

Code Commission Notes.

Former chapter 44, §§4-44-101 —4-44-109, concerning the 1996 Tennessee bicentennial commission, was deemed obsolete due to the termination of the commission, effective June 30, 1997.

Chapters 45, 46

[Reserved]